Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-519
Streets; improvement; assessments against public lands; payment.

If in any city of the second class or village there shall be any real estate belonging to any county, school district, city, village, or other political subdivision adjacent to or abutting upon the street or other public way whereon paving, repaving, graveling, or other improvement has been ordered, it shall be the duty of the governing body of the political subdivision to provide for the payment of such special assessments or taxes as may be assessed against the real estate so adjacent or abutting or within an improvement district. In the event of the neglect or refusal so to do, the city or village may recover the amount of such special taxes or assessments in any proper action, and the judgment thus obtained may be enforced in the usual manner.

Laws 1909, c. 22, § 1, p. 193;

Laws 1911, c. 21, § 1, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 5110;

Laws 1915, c. 92, § 1, p. 234;

Laws 1917, c. 102, § 1, p. 269;

Laws 1919, c. 50, § 1, p. 146;

C.S.1922, § 4283;

Laws 1923, c. 135, § 1, p. 333;

Laws 1927, c. 42, § 1, p. 180;

C.S.1929, § 17-432;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 20, p. 533;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-432;

R.S.1943, § 17-519;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 136.

All property in improvement district which either abuts on or is adjacent to improvement made is liable for assessments unless exempted. Chicago & N. W. Ry. Co. v. City of Seward, 166 Neb. 662, 90 N.W.2d 282 (1958).